Utah statutes.
63B-7-502.   Other capital facility authorizations and intent language.

(1) (a)  It is the intent of the Legislature that if funding from General Obligation bonding is provided for construction of new facilities, the Division of Finance shall transfer any occupying agency funds that are currently being used for rent payments to the service fund for debt service on the bonds.

(b)  The Division of Finance may not transfer agency funds for operation and maintenance costs, which will continue to be incurred by the occupying agency.

(2)  It is the intent of the Legislature that Utah State University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct the American West Heritage Center under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated.

(3)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Utah State University allow the construction of the Poisonous Plant Laboratory on state-owned property under the direction of the Federal Government with oversight by the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management and Utah State University as may be required; and

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project.

(4)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  Weber State University use institutional funds to plan, design, and construct the Weight Training room addition under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated; and

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project.

(5)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a) Utah State University Eastern, San Juan campus, use institutional and other funds to plan, design, and construct the Arts and Conference Center under the direction of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management unless supervisory authority has been delegated; and

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project.

(6)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the University of Utah allow the construction of a privately owned West Health Science Mixed Use Facility on state-owned land located at the main campus of the University, under the oversight of the director of the Division of Facilities Construction and Management; and

(b)  no state funds be used for any portion of this project.

(7)  It is the intent of the Legislature that the Division of Facilities Construction and Management use up to $1,225,000 of the funds authorized for the Dead Horse Point Visitors Center project in Section 63B-6-102 for additional code upgrades and other critical repairs to the Dead Horse Point Visitors Center in addition to the modifications needed to meet the Americans with Disabilities Act requirements.

(8)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:

(a)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management proceed with the design of the Physical Education Building at Southern Utah University;

(b)  the design include the full project scope, excluding funds for the purchase of the middle school;

(c)  the 1999 Legislature rank the Physical Education Building at Southern Utah University as the top-ranked capital facility project for full funding in the 1999 annual general session of the Legislature; and

(d)  the Division of Facilities Construction and Management proceed with the bidding process for construction of this project.



Amended by Chapter 465, 2013 General Session

